Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202044-6841
Health care professional, defined.

Health care professional means an individual who is credentialed pursuant to the Uniform Credentialing Act, who is acting within the scope of his or her credential, and who provides a covered service defined by the health benefits plan.

Laws 2020, LB997, § 8.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.